Washington statutes.
RCW 36.09.040

Payment of indebtedness—Transfer of property.

The auditor of the county indebted upon such decision shall give to the auditor of the other county his or her order upon the treasurer for the amount to be paid out of the proper fund, as in other cases, and also make out a transfer of such property as shall be assigned to either county.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4005; 1963 c 4 s 36.09.040. Prior: Code 1881 s 2660; 1863 p 539 s 6; 1854 p 330 s 4; RRS s 3989.]